csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Ind_VV.yaml
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoo
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [nibaawa',nibaawan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [webinigewa',webinigewan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiiwa',madaabiiwan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoowa',maajiibatoowan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaawag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigewag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaawan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigewan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiiwan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoowan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nibaa
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: webinige
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: madaabii
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoo
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: ninibaamin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niwebinigemin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nimadaabiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoomin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: ginibaamin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: giwebinigemin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: gimadaabiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoomin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: nibaam
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: webinigem
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: madaabiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoom
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: ninibaasiinaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niwebinigesiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiisiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoosiinaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: ginibaasiimwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: giwebinigesiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiisiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiimwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: ginibaasiinaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: giwebinigesiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiisiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoosiinaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [nibaasiibanii',nibaasiibaniin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [webinigesiibanii',webinigesiibaniin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiisiibanii',madaabiisiibaniin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoosiibanii',maajiibatoosiibaniin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiibaniig
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiibaniig
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiibaniig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiibaniig
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiibaniin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiibaniin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiibaniin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiibaniin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiiban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiiban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: ninibaasiiminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niwebinigesiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nimadaabiisiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoosiiminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: ginibaasiiminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: giwebinigesiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: gimadaabiisiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiiminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: nibaasiimwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: webinigesiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: madaabiisiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoosiimwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: ninibaanaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niwebinigenaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoonaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: ginibaamwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: giwebinigemwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoomwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: ginibaanaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: giwebinigenaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoonaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [nibaabanii',nibaabaniin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [webinigebanii',webinigebaniin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiibanii',madaabiibaniin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoobanii',maajiibatoobaniin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nibaabaniig
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: webinigebaniig
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiibaniig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoobaniig
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nibaabaniin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: webinigebaniin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiibaniin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoobaniin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nibaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: webinigeban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatooban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: ninibaaminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niwebinigeminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nimadaabiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoominaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: ginibaaminaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: giwebinigeminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: gimadaabiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoominaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: nibaamwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: webinigemwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: madaabiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoomwaaban
